Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.990

Treatment of residential structures occupied by persons with handicaps.

No county may enact or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation or official control, policy, or administrative practice which treats a residential structure occupied by persons with handicaps differently than a similar residential structure occupied by a family or other unrelated individuals. As used in this section, "handicaps" are as defined in the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3602).

[ 1993 c 478 s 22.]